Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5707.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 30103. (1) A permit is not required under this part for any of the following: (a) Any fill or structure existing before April 1, 1966, in waters covered by former 1965 PA 291, and any fill or structures existing before January 9, 1973, in waters covered for the first time by former 1972 PA 346. (b) A seasonal structure placed on bottomland to facilitate private noncommercial recreational use of the water if it the structure does not unreasonably interfere with the use of the water by others entitled to use the water or interfere with water flow. (c) Reasonable sanding of beaches to the existing water's edge by the riparian owner or a person authorized by the riparian owner. (d) Maintenance of an agricultural drain, regardless of outlet, if all of the following requirements are met: (i) The maintenance includes only activities that maintain the location, depth, and bottom width of the drain as constructed or modified at any time before July 1, 2014. (ii) The maintenance is performed by the landowner or pursuant to in accordance with the drain code of 1956, 1956 PA 40, MCL 280.1 to 280.630. (e) Maintenance and operation of a waste collection or treatment facility either ordered to be constructed or approved for operation under a state or a federal water pollution control law and this part. For purposes of this subdivision, "operation" includes dredging, filling, or construction and placement of structures in the waste collection or treatment facility in compliance with this act. (f) Construction and maintenance of minor drainage structures and facilities that are identified by rule in rules promulgated by the department under section 30110. Before a rule is promulgated pursuant to under this subsection, the rule must be approved by the majority of a committee consisting of the director of the department, the director of the department of agriculture and rural development, and the director of the state transportation department or their the directors' designated representatives. The rules shall must be reviewed at least annually. (g) Maintenance of a drain that either was legally established and constructed before January 1, 1973, pursuant to in accordance with the drain code of 1956, 1956 PA 40, MCL 280.1 to 280.630, except those legally established drains constituting that constitute mainstream portions of certain natural watercourses identified in rules promulgated by the department under section 30110, or was constructed or modified under a permit issued pursuant to under this part. As used in this subdivision, "maintenance of a drain" means the physical preservation of the location, depth, and bottom width of a drain and appurtenant structures to restore the function and approximate capacity of the drain as constructed or modified at any time before July 1, 2014, and includes, but is not limited to, the following activities if performed with best management practices: (i) Excavation of accumulated sediments back to original contours. (ii) Reshaping of the side slopes. (iii) Bank stabilization where reasonably necessary to prevent erosion. Materials used for stabilization must be compatible with existing bank or bed materials. (iv) Armoring, lining, or piping if a previously armored, lined, or piped section is being repaired and all work occurs within the footprint of the previous work. (v) Replacement of existing control structures, if the original function of the drain is not changed and the original approximate capacity of the drain is not increased. (vi) Repair of stabilization structures. (vii) Culvert replacement, including culvert extensions of not more than 24 additional feet per culvert. (viii) Emergency reconstruction of recently damaged parts of the drain. Emergency reconstruction must occur within a reasonable period of time after damage occurs in order to qualify for this exemption. (h) Projects constructed under the watershed protection and flood prevention act, 16 USC 1001 to 1012.1012a. (i) Construction and maintenance of privately owned cooling or storage ponds used in connection with a public utility except at the interface with public waters. (j) Maintenance of a structure constructed under a permit issued pursuant to under this part and identified by rule promulgated under section 30110, if the maintenance is in place and in kind with no design or materials modification. (k) A water withdrawal. (l) Annual installation of a seasonal dock or docks, pilings, mooring buoys, or other mooring structures previously authorized by and in accordance with a permit issued under this part. (m) Controlled access of livestock to streams for watering or crossing if constructed in accordance with applicable practice standards set by the United States Department of Agriculture, Natural Resources Conservation Service. (n) Temporary drawdowns of impoundments at hydroelectric projects licensed by the federal energy regulatory commission Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC) and subject to FERC's authority if both of the following apply: (i) The FERC licensee has consulted this state during the drawdown plan development and this state's concerns have been are addressed in the drawdown plan as FERC considers appropriate. (ii) Adverse environmental impacts, including stream flow, aquatic resources, and timing, have been avoided and minimized to the extent practical. (o) Removal, by the riparian owner or a person authorized by the riparian owner, of plants that are an aquatic nuisance, as that term is defined in section 3301, if the removal is accomplished by hand-pulling without using a powered or mechanized tool and all plant fragments are removed from the water and properly disposed of on land above the ordinary high-water mark. as defined in section 30101. (p) Raking of lake bottomlands by the riparian owner or a person authorized by the riparian owner. To minimize effects on the lake bottomlands, the areas raked shall must be unvegetated before raking and predominantly composed of sand or pebbles, and the raking shall must be performed without using a powered or mechanized tool. For the purposes of this subdivision, the pulling of a nonpowered, nonmechanized tool with a boat is not the use of a powered or mechanized tool. (q) Excavation or construction of a pond on land zoned for residential or agricultural use if all the following conditions are met: (i) The pond, after excavation or construction, will be less than 1 acre in total surface area. (ii) The pond is or will be for noncommercial, residential use. (iii) The pond is not connected to a lake, river, or stream. (r) Placement or distribution of spoils from the excavation of a pond described under subdivision (q) on land adjacent to the upland portions of the property on which the pond is located, or on or near the site of the excavation. (2) As used in this section: , "water (a) "Residential use" means the use of land, buildings, or structures for human homes or dwelling places. (b) "Water withdrawal" means the removal of water from its source for any purpose. (3) Subsection (1)(q) and (r) are retroactive and take effect January 1, 2020. (4)(3) As used in this part, "agricultural drain" means a human-made conveyance of water that meets all of the following requirements: (a) Does not have continuous flow. (b) Flows primarily as a result of precipitation-induced surface runoff or groundwater drained through subsurface drainage systems. (c) Serves agricultural production. (d) Was constructed before January 1, 1973, or was constructed in compliance with this part or former 1979 PA 203. Sec. 30305. (1) Activities that require a permit under part 325 or part 301 or 325 or a discharge that is authorized by a discharge permit under section 3112 or 3113 do not require a permit under this part. (2) The following uses are allowed in a wetland without a permit subject to other laws of this state and the owner's regulation: (a) Fishing, trapping, or hunting. (b) Swimming or boating. (c) Hiking. (d) Grazing of animals, including fencing and post placement if the fence is designed to control livestock, does not exceed 11 feet in height, and utilizes an amount of material that does not exceed that of a woven wire fence utilizing 6-inch vertical spacing and posts. (e) Farming, horticulture, silviculture, lumbering, and ranching activities, including plowing, irrigation, irrigation ditching, seeding, cultivating, minor drainage, harvesting for the production of food, fiber, and forest products, or upland soil and water conservation practices. All of the following apply for the purposes of this subdivision: (i) Beginning October 1, 2013, to To be allowed in a wetland without a permit, these activities shall must be part of an established ongoing farming, ranching, horticultural, or silvicultural operation. Farming and silvicultural activities on areas lying fallow as part of a conventional rotational cycle are part of an established ongoing operation, unless modifications to the hydrological regime or mechanized land clearing are necessary to resume operation. Activities that bring into farming, ranching, horticultural, or silvicultural use an area not in any of these uses, or that convert an area from a forested or silvicultural use to a farming, ranching, or horticultural use, are not part of an established ongoing operation. (ii) Minor drainage does not include drainage associated with the immediate or gradual conversion of a wetland to a nonwetland, or conversion from 1 wetland use to another. Minor drainage does not include the construction of a canal, ditch, dike, or other waterway or structure that drains or otherwise significantly modifies a stream, lake, or wetland. (iii) Wetland altered under this subdivision shall must not be used for a purpose other than a purpose described in this section without a permit from the department. (f) Maintenance or operation of serviceable structures in existence on October 1, 1980 or constructed pursuant to under this part or former 1979 PA 203. (g) Construction or maintenance of farm or stock ponds. (h) Maintenance of an agricultural drain, regardless of outlet, if all of the following requirements are met: (i) The maintenance includes only activities that maintain the location, depth, and bottom width of the drain as constructed or modified at any time before July 1, 2014. (ii) The maintenance is performed by the landowner or pursuant to in accordance with the drain code of 1956, 1956 PA 40, MCL 280.1 to 280.630. (iii) The maintenance does not include any modification that results in additional wetland drainage or conversion of a wetland to a use to which it was not previously subject. (i) Maintenance of a drain that was legally established and constructed pursuant to in accordance with the drain code of 1956, 1956 PA 40, MCL 280.1 to 280.630, if the drain was constructed before January 1, 1973 or under a permit issued pursuant to under this part. As used in this subdivision, "maintenance of a drain" means the physical preservation of the location, depth, and bottom width of a drain and appurtenant structures to restore the function and approximate capacity of the drain as constructed or modified at any time before July 1, 2014, including the placement of spoils removed from the drain in locations along that drain where spoils have been previously placed. Maintenance of a drain under this subdivision does not include any modification that results in additional wetland drainage or conversion of a wetland to a use to which it was not previously subject. (j) Construction or maintenance of farm roads, forest roads, or temporary roads for moving mining or forestry equipment, if the roads are constructed and maintained in a manner to ensure that any adverse effect on the wetland will be minimized. Borrow material for road construction or maintenance shall must be taken from upland sources if feasible. In determining whether an alternative will minimize any adverse effect on the wetland, the department shall consider cost, existing technology, and logistics in light of overall project purposes. (k) Maintenance of public streets, highways, or roads that meets all of the following requirements: (i) Does not include any modification that changes the original location or footprint. (ii) Is done in a manner that minimizes any adverse effect on the wetland. (l) Maintenance or repair of utility lines and associated support structures that meets all of the following requirements: (i) Is done in a manner that minimizes any adverse effect on the wetland. (ii) Does not include any modification to the character, scope, or size of the originally constructed design. (iii) Does not convert a wetland area to a use to which it was not previously subject. For the purposes of this subdivision and subdivision (m), "utility line" means any pipe or pipeline used for the transportation of any gaseous, liquid, liquescent, or slurry substance, for any purpose, and any cable, line, or wire for the transmission for any purpose of electrical energy, telephone or telegraph messages, or radio or television communication. (m) Installation of utility lines having that have a diameter of 6 inches or less using directional drilling or boring, or knifing-in, and the placement of poles with minimal (less than 1 cubic yard) structure support, if the utility lines and poles are installed in a manner that minimizes any adverse effect on the wetland. Directional drilling or boring under this subdivision shall must meet all of the following requirements: (i) The top of the utility line is at least 4 feet below the soil surface of the wetland. However, if the presence of rock prevents the placement of the utility line at the depth otherwise required by this subparagraph, the bottom of the utility line is not placed higher than the top of the rock. (ii) The entry and exit holes are located a sufficient distance from the wetland to ensure that disturbance of the wetland does not occur. (iii) The operation does not result in the eruption or release of any drilling fluids up through the ground and into the wetland and there is an adequate plan to respond to any release of drilling mud or other fill material. (n) Operation or maintenance, including reconstruction of recently damaged parts, of serviceable dikes and levees in existence on October 1, 1980 or constructed pursuant to under this part or former 1979 PA 203. (o) Placement of biological residuals from activities, including the cutting of woody vegetation or the in-place grinding of tree stumps, performed under this section within a wetland, if all the biological residuals originate within that wetland. (p) Excavation or construction of a pond on land zoned for residential or agricultural use if all the following conditions are met: (i) The pond, after excavation or construction, will be less than 1 acre in total surface area. (ii) The pond is or will be for noncommercial, residential use. (iii) The pond is not connected to a lake, river, or stream. (q) Placement or distribution of spoils from the excavation of a pond described under subdivision (p) on land adjacent to the upland portions of the property on which the pond is located. (3) An activity in a wetland that was effectively drained for farming before October 1, 1980 and that on and after October 1, 1980 has continued to be effectively drained as part of an ongoing farming operation is not subject to regulation under this part. (4) A wetland that is incidentally created as a result of 1 or more of the following activities is not subject to regulation under this part: (a) Excavation as part of commercial sand, gravel, or mineral mining, if the area was not a wetland before excavation. This exemption from regulation applies until the property on which the wetland is located meets both of the following requirements: (i) Is no longer used for excavation as part of commercial sand, gravel, or mineral mining. (ii) Is being used for another purpose unrelated to excavation as part of commercial sand, gravel, or mineral mining. (b) Construction and operation of a water treatment pond, lagoon, or storm water stormwater facility in compliance with the requirements of state or federal water pollution control laws. (c) A diked area associated with a landfill if the landfill complies with the terms of the landfill construction permit and if the diked area was not a wetland before diking. (d) Construction of drains in upland for the sole purpose of removing excess soil moisture from upland areas that are primarily in agricultural use. (e) Construction of roadside ditches in upland for the sole purpose of removing excess soil moisture from upland. (f) An agricultural soil and water conservation practice designed, constructed, and maintained for the purpose of enhancing water quality. (5) An area that becomes contiguous to a water body created as a result of commercial excavation for sand, gravel, or mineral mining is not subject to regulation under this part solely because it that area is contiguous to the created water body. This exemption from regulation applies until the property on which the wetland is located meets both of the following requirements: (a) Is no longer used for excavation as part of commercial sand, gravel, or mineral mining. (b) Is being used for another purpose unrelated to excavation as part of commercial sand, gravel, or mineral mining. (6) Except as provided in subsection (7), the following activities are not subject to regulation under this part: (a) Leveling of sand, removal of vegetation, grooming of soil, or removal of debris, in an area of unconsolidated material predominantly composed of sand, rock, or pebbles, located between the ordinary high-water mark and the water's edge. (b) Mowing of vegetation between the ordinary high-water mark and the water's edge. (7) Subsection (6) does not apply to lands included in the survey of the delta of the St. Clair River, otherwise referred to as the St. Clair flats, located within Clay township, St. Clair county, as provided for in 1899 PA 175. (8) As used in this section: (a) "Residential use" means the use of land, buildings, or structures for human homes or dwelling places. (b) "Utility line" means any pipe or pipeline used for the transportation of any gaseous, liquid, liquescent, or slurry substance, for any purpose, and any cable, line, or wire for the transmission for any purpose of electrical energy, telephone or telegraph messages, or radio or television communication. (9) (8) As used in this part, "agricultural drain" means a human-made conveyance of water that meets all of the following requirements: (a) Does not have continuous flow. (b) Flows primarily as a result of precipitation-induced surface runoff or groundwater drained through subsurface drainage systems. (c) Serves agricultural production. (d) Was constructed before January 1, 1973, or was constructed in compliance with this part or former 1979 PA 203.